Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska90-306
Governor; appoint board or commission members.

The Governor may appoint members to a board or commission which is formed by the city of Lincoln or the county of Lancaster or both governmental bodies to protect and improve the Nebraska State Capitol environs.

Laws 1988, LB 962, § 2.